Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
Article 11
Militia

§ 1. Persons liable to military duty.

The militia shall consist of all able-bodied male persons, residents of the State, between the ages of eighteen and forty-five years; except such as may be exempted by the laws of the United States, or this State; and shall be organized, officered, armed and equipped and trained in such manner as may be provided by law.

Part of Executive Branch.

An organized militia is provided for in the Constitution and is recognized as a part of the executive branch of the state government. Belote v. Coffman, 117 Ark. 352, 175 S.W. 37 (1915).

§ 2. Volunteer companies.

Volunteer Companies of Infantry, Cavalry or Artillery may be formed in such manner and with such restrictions as may be provided by law.

§ 3. Privilege of members from arrest.

The volunteer and militia forces shall in all cases (except treason, felony and breach of the peace) be privileged from arrest during their attendance at muster and the election of officers, and in going to and returning from the same.

§ 4. Authority to call out volunteers or militia.

The Governor shall, when the General Assembly is not in session, have power to call out the Volunteers or Militia, or both, to execute the laws, repel invasion, repress insurrection and preserve the public peace; in such manner as may be authorized by law.